Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3817.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 1315, as
amended by Section 22, Chapter 379, O.S.L. 2025 (74 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1315), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1315. A. Upon application in writing and subject to
any underwriting criteria that may be established by the Oklahoma
Health Care Authority, the Authority may extend the benefits of the
Oklahoma Employees Insurance and Benefits Plans to employees who are
employed in positions requiring actual performance of duty during

Req. No. 16276 Page 1

not less than one thousand (1,000) hours per year and to all full-
time employees of:
1. Any of the following groups which participate in the
Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System:
a. county,
b. city,
c. town,
d. public trust for which the state is the primary
beneficiary, or
e. conservation districts; and
2. Any of the following groups:
a. county hospital,
b. rural water district, including employees and board
members,
c. sewer district,
d. gas district,
e. solid waste management district,
f. nonprofit water corporation employees and board
members,
g. conservancy district or master conservancy district
authorized by the provisions of Section 541 of Title
82 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
h. voluntary organization of Oklahoma local government
jurisdictions listed in Section 2003 of Title 62 of
Req. No. 16276 Page 2

the Oklahoma Statutes including any council created by
the voluntary organizations,
i. voluntary association designated to administer the
County Government Council as authorized in Section 7
of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
j. statewide nonprofit entities representing employees of
the state or employees of local political subdivisions
who are eligible for insurance benefits authorized by
the provisions of the Oklahoma Employees Insurance and
Benefits Act, or
k. statewide nonprofit entities receiving state funds to
provide no cost legal services to low income and
senior citizens; and
3. Any city or town in Oklahoma who participates in a
retirement system organized under Sections 48-101 through 48-106 of
Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Applications to participate in the Oklahoma Employees
Insurance and Benefits Plans shall be approved by majority action of
the governing body of the groups listed in subsection A of this
section.
C. Groups listed in subsection A of this section participating
in the Oklahoma Employees Insurance and Benefits Plans shall pay all
costs attributable to their participation. The benefits of said
plans for a participant provided coverage pursuant to this section
Req. No. 16276 Page 3

shal l be the same and shall include the same plan options as would
be made available to a state employee participating in the plan that
resided at the same location. The premium for participating groups
listed in subsection A of this section shall be the same as paid by
state and education employees.
D. Participating groups listed in subsection A of this section
shall not be required to offer dental insurance as defined in
paragraph 12 of Section 1303 of this title, or other insurance as
defined in paragraph 13 of Section 1303 of this title. However, if
dental insurance or any other insurance is offered, it must be
provided to all eligible employees. If an employee retires and
begins to receive benefits from the Oklahoma Public Employees
Retirement System or terminates service and has a vested benefit
with the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System, the employee
may elect, in the manner provided in Section 1316.2 of this title,
to participate in the dental insurance plan offered through the
Oklahoma Employees Insurance and Benefits Act within thirty (30)
days from the date of termination of employment. The employee shall
pay the full cost of the dental insurance.
E. 1. Any employee of a group listed in subsection A of this
section who retires or who has a vested benefit pursuant to the
Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System may begin the health
insurance coverage if the employer of the employee is not a
participant of the Oklahoma Employees Insurance and Benefits Act and
Req. No. 16276 Page 4

does not offer health insurance to its employees. Such election by
the employee to begin coverage shall be made within thirty (30) days
from the date of termination of service.
2. Any employee of a group listed in subsection A of this
section who retires or who has a vested benefit pursuant to the
Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System may begin or continue
the health insurance coverage if the employer of the employee is a
participant of the Oklahoma Employees Insurance and Benefits Act and
the election to begin or continue coverage is made within thirty
(30) days from the date of termination of service.
F. Any county, city, town, county hospital, public trust,
conservation district, or rural water, sewer, gas or solid waste
management district, or nonprofit water corporation, any of which of
the aforementioned groups is not a participating employer in the
Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System, but which has employees
who are participating in the health, dental or life insurance plans
offered by or through the Oklahoma Employees Insurance and Benefits
Act on July 1, 1997, may continue to allow its current and future
employees to participate in such health, dental or life insurance
plans. Participation of such employees may also continue following
termination of employment if the employee has completed at least
eight (8) years of service with a participating employer and such an
election to continue in force is made within thirty (30) days
following termination of employment. Any retiree or terminated
Req. No. 16276 Page 5

empl oyee electing coverage pursuant to this section shall pay the
full cost of the insurance.
G. An employee of a group listed in paragraph 2 of subsection A
of this section may continue in force health, dental and life
insurance coverage following termination of employment if the
employee has a minimum of eight (8) years of service with a
participating employer and the election to continue in force is made
within thirty (30) calendar days following termination of
employment.
H. Notwithstanding other provisions in this section, an
employer listed in subsection A of this section may cease to
participate in the Oklahoma Employees Insurance and Benefits Act but
provide health insurance coverage for its current and former
employees through another insurance carrier. The subsequent carrier
shall be responsible for providing coverage to the entity's
employees who terminated employment with a retirement benefit, with
a vested benefit, or who have eight (8) or more years of service
with a participating employer but did not have a vested benefit
through the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System, if the
election to retain health insurance coverage was made within thirty
(30) days of termination of employment. Coverage shall also be
provided to the eligible dependents of the employees if an election
to retain coverage is made within thirty (30) days of termination of
employment. Employees who terminate employment from an employer
Req. No. 16276 Page 6

cove red by this subsection before December 31, 2001, and elect
coverage under the Oklahoma Employees Insurance and Benefits Act,
shall not be required to change insurance carriers in the event that
the employer changes its insurance carrier to a subsequent carrier.
The provisions of this subsection shall become effective January 1,
2002.
I. Employers pursuant to subsection A of this section who
participate in the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System and
who offer health insurance coverage to their active employees, shall
offer health insurance coverage to those employees who retire from
the employer and also to those employees who terminate employment
and are eligible to elect a vested benefit in the System. Such
employers shall begin offering coverage to such employees on or
before January 1, 2004. Such employees who wish to continue
coverage shall make an election to retain health insurance coverage
within thirty (30) days of termination of employment. However,
former employees of such employers who have already retired or who
have terminated and are eligible to elect a vested benefit under the
Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System, during the period
beginning January 1, 2002, and ending December 31, 2003, may make an
election to begin participation in the plans offered by the
Authority on or before December 31, 2003, in the same manner as
other participating retired or vested members. The employer,
assisted by the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System shall
Req. No. 16276 Page 7

noti fy by October 1, 2003, all members who have either retired from
the System or who are eligible to elect a vested benefit in the
System between January 1, 2002, through December 31, 2003, and who
were employed by an employer listed in subsection A of this section
of the member's potential eligibility to participate in such plans.
Each employer shall notify the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement
System when an employee is retiring and makes the election pursuant
to this subsection to continue coverage under a plan offered by such
employer and when an employee terminates employment and is eligible
to elect a vested benefit in the System and such employee elects to
continue coverage under a plan offered by such employer. Such
employer shall also notify the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement
System if a retired employee or an employee who is eligible to elect
a vested benefit in the System terminates such continued coverage.
J. Any group that begins participation in the Oklahoma
Employees Insurance and Benefits Plans after March 17, 1970, and
that is not composed of state or education employees must have one
hundred percent (100%) participation in the health plan offered
pursuant to the Oklahoma Employees Insurance and Benefits Act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16276 MJ 02/11/26


Req. No. 16276 Page 8